New York, session 2025-2026, S10282.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The department of taxation and finance is authorized and 2 directed to create and implement an online program which will enable 3 each New York state taxpayer to prepare and electronically file such 4 taxpayer's federal and state income tax returns free of charge, regard- 5 less of the taxpayer's income level. This program shall be made avail- 6 able to all New York state taxpayers on the department's website no 7 later than one hundred eighty days following the effective date of this 8 act. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04820-01-5